California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The department shall facilitate improved access to relevant client and financial data from all state agencies, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Education, the State Department of Health Services, the State Department of Mental Health, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the Department of Finance.

(b) The State Department of Mental Health shall expand the funding allocated to the contract for independent evaluation, as necessary to accommodate the increase in workload created by the addition of new sites.

(c) Subject to the availability of funds, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop uniform data collection and reporting measures applicable to all participating counties.

(2) Collect, analyze, and report performance outcome data for participating counties as a group in comparison to state averages.

(3) Offer technical assistance to participating counties related to data collection, analysis, and reporting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1161, Sec. 40.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Mental Health Student Services Act [5886. - 5886.]

5886.

(a) The Behavioral Health Student Services Act is hereby established as a mental health partnership grant program for the purpose of establishing mental health partnerships between a county’s mental health or behavioral health departments and school districts, charter schools, and the county office of education within the county.

(b) The Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission shall award grants to county mental health or behavioral health departments to fund partnerships between educational and county mental health entities. Subject to an appropriation for this purpose, commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year, the commission shall award a grant under this section to a county mental health or behavioral health department, or another
 lead agency, as identified by the partnership within each county that meets the requirements of this section.

(1) County, city, or multicounty mental health or behavioral health departments, or a consortium of those entities, including multicounty partnerships, may, in partnership with one or more school districts and at least one of the following educational entities located within the county, apply for a grant to fund activities of the partnership:

(A) The county office of education.

(B) A charter school.

(2) (A) An educational entity may be designated as the lead agency at the request of the county, city, or multicounty department, or consortium, and authorized to submit the application.

(B) The county, city, or multicounty department, or consortium, shall be the grantee and receive grant funds awarded pursuant to this section, even if an educational entity is designated as the lead agency and submits the application pursuant to this paragraph.

(c) The commission shall establish criteria for awarding funds under the grant program, including the allocation of grant funds pursuant to this section, and shall require that applicants comply with, at a minimum, all of the following requirements:

(1) That all school districts, charter schools, and the county office of education have been invited to participate in the partnership, to the extent possible.

(2) That
 an applicant include with their application a plan developed and approved in collaboration with participating educational entity partners and that include a letter of intent, a memorandum of understanding, or other evidence of support or approval by the governing boards of all partners.

(3) That plans address all of the following goals:

(A) Preventing mental illnesses from becoming severe and disabling.

(B) Improving timely access to services for underserved populations.

(C) Providing outreach to families, employers, primary care health care providers, and others to recognize the early signs of potentially severe and disabling mental illnesses.

(D) Reducing the stigma associated with the diagnosis of a mental illness or seeking mental health services.

(E) Reducing discrimination against people with mental illness.

(F) Preventing negative outcomes in the targeted population, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Suicide and attempted suicide.

(ii) Incarceration.

(iii) School failure or dropout.

(iv) Unemployment.

(v) Worsening of symptoms and the condition over time.

(vi) Homelessness.

(vii) Removal of a child or youth from their home.

(viii) Involuntary mental health detentions.

(4) That plans include a description of the following:

(A) The need
 for mental health services for children and youth, including campus-based mental health services and potential gaps in local service connections.

(B) The proposed use of funds, which shall include, at a minimum, that funds will be used to provide personnel or peer support.

(C) How the funds will be used to facilitate linkage and access to ongoing and sustained services, including, but not limited to, objectives and anticipated outcomes.

(D) How the partnership will collaborate with preschool and childcare providers, or other early childhood service organizations, to ensure the mental health needs of children are met before and after they transition to a school setting.

(E) The partnership’s ability to do all of the following:

(i) Obtain federal Medicaid or other reimbursement, including Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic, and Treatment funds, when applicable, or to leverage other funds, when feasible.

(ii) Collect information on the health insurance carrier for each child or youth, with the permission of the child or youth’s parent, to allow the partnership to seek reimbursement for mental health services provided to children and youth, where applicable.

(iii) Engage a health care service plan or a health insurer in the mental health partnership, when applicable, and to the extent mutually agreed to by the partnership and the plan or insurer.

(iv) Administer an effective service program and the degree to which mental health providers and educational entities will support
 and collaborate to accomplish the goals of the effort.

(v) Connect children and youth to a source of ongoing mental health services, including, but not limited to, through Medi-Cal, specialty mental health plans, county mental health programs, or private health coverage.

(vi) Continue to provide services and activities under this program after grant funding has been expended.

(d) Grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be used to provide support services that include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Services provided on school campuses, to the extent practicable.

(2) Suicide prevention services.

(3) Drop-out
 prevention services.

(4) Outreach to high-risk youth and young adults, including, but not limited to, foster youth, youth who identify as LGBTQ+, victims of domestic violence and sexual abuse, and youth who have been expelled or suspended from school.

(5) Placement assistance and development of a service plan that can be sustained over time for students in need of ongoing services.

(e) Funding may also be used to provide other prevention, early intervention, and direct services, including, but not limited to, hiring qualified mental health personnel, professional development for school staff on trauma-informed and evidence-based mental health practices, and other strategies that respond to the mental health needs of children and youth, as determined by the commission.

(f) (1) The commission shall determine the amount of grants and shall take into consideration the level of need and the number of schoolage youth in participating educational entities when determining grant amounts.

(2) In determining the distribution of funds appropriated in the 2021–22 fiscal year, the commission shall take into consideration previous funding the grantee received under this section.

(g) The commission may establish incentives to provide matching funds by awarding additional grant funds to partnerships that do so.

(h) If the commission is unable to provide a grant to a partnership in a county because of a lack of applicants or because no applicants met the minimum requirements within the timeframes established by the
 commission, the commission may redistribute those funds to other eligible grantees.

(i) Partnerships currently receiving grants from the Investment in Mental Health Wellness Act of 2013 (Part 3.8 (commencing with Section 5848.5)) are eligible to receive a grant under this section for the expansion of services funded by that grant or for the inclusion of additional educational entity partners within the mental health partnership.

(j) Grants awarded pursuant to this section may be used to supplement, but not supplant, existing financial and resource commitments of the county, city, or multicounty mental health or behavioral health departments, or a consortium of those entities, or educational entities that receive a grant.

(k) (1) The commission shall develop metrics and a system to measure and
 publicly report on the performance outcomes of services provided using the grants.

(2) (A) The commission shall provide a status report to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature on the progress of implementation of this section no later than March 1, 2022, and provide an updated report no later than March 1, 2024. The reports shall address, at a minimum, all of the following:

(i) Successful strategies.

(ii) Identified needs for additional services.

(iii) Lessons learned.

(iv) Numbers of, and demographic information for, the schoolage children and youth served.

(v) Available data on outcomes,
 including, but not limited to, linkages to ongoing services and success in meeting the goals identified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(B) The reports to be submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(l) This section does not require the use of funds allocated for the purpose of satisfying the minimum funding obligation under Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for the partnerships established by this section.

(m) The commission may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis to implement this section. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision are exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(n) This section shall be implemented only to the extent moneys are appropriated in the annual Budget Act or another statute for purposes of this section.

(o) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 45) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 57.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.1. Full-Service Partnership [5887. - 5887.1.]

5887.

(a) Each county shall establish and administer a full-service partnership program that include the following services:

(1) Mental health services, supportive services, and substance use disorder treatment services.

(2) Assertive Community Treatment and Forensic Assertive Community Treatment fidelity, Individual Placement and Support model of Supported Employment, high fidelity wraparound, or other evidence-based services and treatment models, as specified by the State Department of Health Care
 Services. Counties with a population of less than 200,000 may request an exemption from these requirements. Exemption requests shall be subject to approval by the State Department of Health Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services shall collaborate with the California State Association of Counties and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California on reasonable criteria for those requests and a timely and efficient exemption process.

(3) Assertive field-based initiation for substance use disorder treatment services, including the provision of medications for addiction treatment, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(4) Outpatient behavioral health services, either clinic or field based, necessary for the ongoing evaluation and stabilization of an enrolled individual.

(5) Ongoing engagement services necessary to maintain enrolled individuals in their treatment plan inclusive of clinical and nonclinical services, including services to support maintaining housing.

(6) Other evidence-based services and treatment models, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(7) The service planning process pursuant to Sections 5806 or 5868 and all services identified during the applicable process.

(8) Housing interventions pursuant to Section 5830.

(b) (1) (A) Full-service partnership services shall be provided pursuant to a whole-person approach that is trauma informed, age appropriate, and in partnership with families or an individual’s natural
 supports.

(B) These services shall be provided in a streamlined and coordinated manner so as to reduce any barriers to services.

(2) Full-service partnership services shall support the individual in the recovery process, reduce health disparities, and be provided for the length of time identified during the service planning process pursuant to Sections 5806 and 5868.

(c) Full-service partnership programs shall employ community-defined evidence practices, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(d) (1) Full-service partnership programs shall enroll eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892, who meet the priority population criteria specified in subdivision
 (d) of Section 5892 and other criteria, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) Full-service partnership programs shall enroll eligible children and youth, as defined in Section 5892.

(e) Full-service partnership programs shall have an established standard of care with levels based on an individual’s acuity and criteria for step-down into the least intensive level of care, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, counties, providers, and other stakeholders.

(f) All behavioral health services, as defined in subdivision
 (k) of Section 5892, and supportive services provided to a client enrolled in a full-service partnership shall be paid from the funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892, subject to Section 5891.

(g) (1) The clinical record of each client participating in a
 full-service partnership program shall describe all services identified during the service planning process pursuant to Sections 5806 and 5868 that are provided to the client pursuant to this section.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services may develop and revise documentation standards for service planning to be consistent with the standards developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 14184.402.

(3) Documentation of the service planning process in the client’s clinical record pursuant to paragraph (1) may fulfill the documentation requirements for both the Medi-Cal program and this section.

(h) For purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Community-defined evidence practices” means an alternative or complement to evidence-based practices that offer culturally anchored interventions that reflect the values, practices, histories, and lived-experiences of the communities they serve. These practices come from the community and the organizations that serve them and are found to yield positive results as determined by community consensus over time.

(2) “Substance use disorder treatment services” means those services as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(3) “Supportive services” means those services necessary to support clients’ recovery and wellness, including, but not limited to, food,
 clothing, linkages to needed social services, linkages to programs administered by the federal Social Security Administration, vocational and education-related services, employment assistance, including supported employment, psychosocial rehabilitation, family engagement, psychoeducation, transportation assistance, occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapist, and group and individual activities that promote a sense of purpose and community participation.

(i) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are provided from the Behavioral Health Services Fund for purposes of this section. This section does not obligate the counties to use funds from any other source for services pursuant to this section.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until
 January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 688, Sec. 2.   (AB 348)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 5887.1.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 688.    Note: Added in Prop. 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5887.

(a) Each county shall establish and administer a full-service partnership program that include the following services:

(1) Mental health services, supportive services, and substance use disorder treatment services.

(2) Assertive Community Treatment and Forensic Assertive Community Treatment fidelity, Individual Placement and Support model of Supported Employment, high fidelity wraparound, or other evidence-based services and treatment models, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services. Counties with a population of less than 200,000 may request an exemption from these requirements. Exemption requests shall be subject to approval by the State Department of Health
 Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services shall collaborate with the California State Association of Counties and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California on reasonable criteria for those requests and a timely and efficient exemption process.

(3) Assertive field-based initiation for substance use disorder treatment services, including the provision of medications for addiction treatment, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(4) Outpatient behavioral health services, either clinic or field based, necessary for the ongoing evaluation and stabilization of an enrolled individual.

(5) Ongoing engagement services necessary to maintain enrolled individuals in their treatment plan inclusive of clinical and nonclinical services, including services to support
 maintaining housing.

(6) Other evidence-based services and treatment models, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(7) The service planning process pursuant to Sections 5806 or 5868 and all services identified during the applicable process.

(8) Housing interventions pursuant to Section 5830.

(b) (1) (A) Full-service partnership services shall be provided pursuant to a whole-person approach that is trauma informed, age appropriate, and in partnership with families or an individual’s natural supports.

(B) These services shall be provided in a streamlined and coordinated manner so as to reduce any barriers to services.

(2) Full-service partnership services shall support the individual in the recovery process, reduce health disparities, and be provided for the length of time identified during the service planning process pursuant to Sections 5806 and 5868.

(c) Full-service partnership programs shall employ community-defined evidence practices, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(d) (1) (A) Full-service partnership programs shall enroll eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892, who meet the priority population criteria specified in subdivision (d) of Section 5892 and other criteria, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(B) Full-service partnership programs
 shall enroll eligible children and youth, as defined in Section 5892.

(2) (A) An individual with a serious mental illness is presumptively eligible for a full-service partnership if they meet one or more of the following criteria:

(i) Is currently experiencing unsheltered homelessness as described in Section 91.5 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(ii) Is transitioning to the community after six months or more in a secured treatment or residential setting, including, but not limited to, a mental health rehabilitation center, institution for mental disease, or secured skilled nursing facility.

(iii) Has been detained five or more times pursuant to Section 5150 over the last five years.

(iv) Is transitioning to the community after six months or more in the state prison or county jail.

(B) A county is not required to enroll an individual who meets the presumptive eligibility criteria in subparagraph (A) if doing so would conflict with contractual Medi-Cal obligations or court orders, or exceed full-service partnership capacity or funding pursuant to Section 5892.

(C) Enrollment of a presumptively eligible individual pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be contingent upon both of the following:

(i) The individual meets the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (e).

(ii) The individual receives a recommendation by a licensed behavioral health clinician who, after assessing
 the individual’s mental health needs, finds enrollment appropriate. This recommendation shall be documented in the individual’s clinical record.

(3) An individual with a serious mental illness shall not be deemed ineligible for enrollment in a full-service partnership solely because their primary diagnosis is a substance use disorder.

(e) Full-service partnership programs shall have an established standard of care with levels based on an individual’s acuity and criteria for step-down into the least intensive level of care, as specified by the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission, counties, providers, and other stakeholders.

(f) All behavioral health services, as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 5892, and supportive
 services provided to a client enrolled in a full-service partnership shall be paid from the funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5892, subject to Section 5891.

(g) (1) The clinical record of each client participating in a full-service partnership program shall describe all services identified during the service planning process pursuant to Sections 5806 and 5868 that are provided to the client pursuant to this section.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services may develop and revise documentation standards for service planning to be consistent with the standards developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 14184.402.

(3) Documentation of the service planning process in the client’s clinical record pursuant to paragraph (1) may
 fulfill the documentation requirements for both the Medi-Cal program and this section.

(h) For purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Community-defined evidence practices” means an alternative or complement to evidence-based practices that offer culturally anchored interventions that reflect the values, practices, histories, and lived-experiences of the communities they serve. These practices come from the community and the organizations that serve them and are found to yield positive results as determined by community consensus over time.

(2) “Substance use disorder treatment services” means those services as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 5891.5.

(3) “Supportive services” means those services necessary to support
 clients’ recovery and wellness, including, but not limited to, food, clothing, linkages to needed social services, linkages to programs administered by the federal Social Security Administration, vocational and education-related services, employment assistance, including supported employment, psychosocial rehabilitation, family engagement, psychoeducation, transportation assistance, occupational therapy provided by an occupational therapist, and group and individual activities that promote a sense of purpose and community participation.

(i) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are provided from the Behavioral Health Services Fund for purposes of this section. This section does not obligate the counties to use funds from any other source for services pursuant to this section.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 688, Sec. 3.   (AB 348)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5887.1.

This part shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 86.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.5. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES FUND [5890. - 5899.1.]

5890.

(a) The Behavioral Health Services Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The fund shall be administered by the state. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are, except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 5892, continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the purpose of funding the following programs and other related activities as designated by other provisions of this division:

(1) Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), the Adult and Older Adult Mental Health System of Care Act.

(2) Part 3.2 (commencing with Section 5830), Innovative Programs.

(3) Part 3.6 (commencing
 with Section 5840), Prevention and Early Intervention Programs.

(4) Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1), No Place Like Home Program.

(5) Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850), the Children’s Mental Health Services Act.

(b) The establishment of this fund and any other provisions of the act establishing it or the programs funded shall not be construed to modify the obligation of health care service plans and disability insurance policies to provide coverage for mental health services, including those services required under Section 1374.72 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10144.5 of the Insurance Code, related to mental health parity. This act shall not be construed to modify the oversight duties of the Department of Managed Health Care or the duties of the Department of Insurance with respect to
 enforcing these obligations of plans and insurance policies.

(c) This act shall not be construed to modify or reduce the existing authority or responsibility of the State Department of Health Care Services.

(d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall seek approval of all applicable federal Medicaid approvals to maximize the availability of federal funds and eligibility of participating children, adults, and seniors for medically necessary care.

(e) Share of costs for services pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) of this division, shall be determined in accordance with the Uniform Method of Determining Ability to Pay applicable to other publicly funded mental health services, unless this Uniform Method is replaced by another method of determining
 copayments, in which case the new method applicable to other mental health services shall be applicable to services pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) of this division.

(f) (1) The Supportive Housing Program Subaccount is hereby created in the Behavioral Health Services Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the subaccount are reserved and continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the California Health Facilities Financing Authority to provide funds to meet its financial obligations pursuant to any service contracts entered into pursuant to Section 5849.35. Notwithstanding any other law, including any other provision of this section, no later than the last day of each month, the Controller shall, before any transfer or expenditure from the fund for any other purpose for the following month, transfer from the
 Behavioral Health Services Fund to the Supportive Housing Program Subaccount an amount that has been certified by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5849.35, but not to exceed an aggregate amount of one hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) per year. If, in any month, the amounts in the Behavioral Health Services Fund are insufficient to fully transfer to the subaccount or the amounts in the subaccount are insufficient to fully pay the amount certified by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority, the shortfall shall be carried over to the next month, to be transferred by the Controller with any transfer required by the preceding sentence. Moneys in the Supportive Housing Program Subaccount shall not be loaned to the General Fund pursuant to Section 16310 or 16381 of the Government Code.

(2) Prior to the issuance of any bonds pursuant to Section 15463 of
 the Government Code, the Legislature may appropriate for transfer funds in the Behavioral Health Services Fund to the Supportive Housing Program Subaccount in an amount up to one hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) per year. Any amount appropriated for transfer pursuant to this paragraph and deposited in the No Place Like Home Fund shall reduce the authorized but unissued amount of bonds that the California Health Facilities Financing Authority may issue pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code by a corresponding amount. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the subaccount transferred pursuant to this paragraph are reserved and continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for transfer to the No Place Like Home Fund, to be used for purposes of Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1). The Controller shall, before any transfer or expenditure from the fund for any other purpose for the following month but after any transfer from the fund for purposes
 of paragraph (1), transfer moneys appropriated from the Behavioral Health Services Fund to the subaccount pursuant to this paragraph in equal amounts over the following 12-month period, beginning no later than 90 days after the effective date of the appropriation by the Legislature. If, in any month, the amounts in the Behavioral Health Services Fund are insufficient to fully transfer to the subaccount or the amounts in the subaccount are insufficient to fully pay the amount appropriated for transfer pursuant to this paragraph, the shortfall shall be carried over to the next month.

(3) The sum of any transfers described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not exceed an aggregate of one hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) per year.

(4) Paragraph (2) shall become inoperative once any bonds authorized pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code are issued.

(g) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 87) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 46.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 85 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 40.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 88 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5890.

(a) (1) The Behavioral Health Services Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(2) The fund shall be administered by the state.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are, except as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 5892, continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the purpose of funding the programs, services, and other related activities as specified in Section 5892 and Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1), the No Place Like Home Program.

(b) (1) The establishment of this fund and other provisions of the act establishing it or the programs funded shall not be construed to modify the obligation of health care service plans and disability insurance policies to provide coverage for behavioral health services, including those services required under Section 1374.72 of the Health and Safety Code and Section 10144.5 of the Insurance Code, related to mental health and substance use disorder parity.

(2) This act does not modify the oversight duties of the Department of Managed Health Care or the duties of the Department of Insurance with respect to enforcing these obligations of plans and insurance policies.

(c) This act does not modify or reduce the existing authority or responsibility of the
 State Department of Health Care Services.

(d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall seek approval of all applicable federal Medicaid approvals to maximize the availability of federal funds and eligibility of participating children and youth, adults, and older adults for medically necessary care.

(e) Share of costs for services pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) shall be determined in accordance with the Uniform Method of Determining Ability to Pay applicable to other publicly funded mental health and substance use disorder treatment services, unless this uniform method is replaced by another method of determining copayments, in which case the new method applicable to other mental health and substance use
 disorder treatment services shall be applicable to services pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850).

(f) (1) (A) The Supportive Housing Program Subaccount is hereby created in the Behavioral Health Services Fund.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the subaccount are reserved and continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the California Health Facilities Financing Authority to provide funds to meet its financial obligations pursuant to service contracts entered into pursuant to Section 5849.35.

(C) Notwithstanding any other law, including any other provision of this section,
 no later than the last day of each month, the Controller shall, before any transfer or expenditure from the fund for any other purpose for the following month, transfer from the Behavioral Health Services Fund to the Supportive Housing Program Subaccount an amount that has been certified by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5849.35 but not to exceed an aggregate amount of one hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) per year.

(D) If, in any month, the amounts in the Behavioral Health Services Fund are insufficient to fully transfer to the subaccount or the amounts in the subaccount are insufficient to fully pay the amount certified by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority, the shortfall shall be carried over to the next month, to be
 transferred by the Controller with any transfer required by the
 preceding sentence.

(E) Moneys in the Supportive Housing Program Subaccount shall not be loaned to the General Fund pursuant to Section 16310 or 16381 of the Government Code.

(2) (A) Prior to the issuance of any bonds pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code, the Legislature may appropriate for transfer funds in the Behavioral Health Services Fund to the Supportive Housing Program Subaccount in an amount up to one hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) per year.

(B) Any amount appropriated for transfer pursuant to this paragraph and deposited in the No Place Like Home Fund shall reduce the authorized but unissued amount of bonds that the California Health Facilities
 Financing Authority may issue pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code by a corresponding amount.

(C) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the subaccount transferred pursuant to this paragraph are reserved and continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for transfer to the No Place Like Home Fund, to be used for purposes of Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1).

(D) The Controller shall, before any transfer or expenditure from the fund for any other purpose for the following month but after any transfer from the fund for purposes of paragraph (1), transfer moneys appropriated from the Behavioral Health Services Fund to the subaccount pursuant to this paragraph in equal amounts over the following 12-month period, beginning
 no later than 90 days after the effective date of the appropriation by the Legislature.

(E) If, in any month, the amounts in the Behavioral Health Services Fund are insufficient to fully transfer to the subaccount or the amounts in the subaccount are insufficient to fully pay the amount appropriated for transfer pursuant to this paragraph, the shortfall shall be carried over to the next month.

(3) The sum of any transfer described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not exceed an aggregate of one hundred forty million dollars ($140,000,000) per year.

(4) Paragraph (2) shall become inoperative once bonds authorized pursuant to Section 15463 of the Government Code are issued.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 87) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 88.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5891.

(a) (1) (A) The funding established pursuant to this act shall be utilized to expand mental health services.

(B) Except as provided in subdivision (j) of Section 5892 due to the state’s fiscal crisis, these funds shall not be used to supplant existing state or county funds utilized to provide mental health services.

(C) The state shall continue to provide financial support for mental health programs with not less than the same entitlements, amounts of allocations from the General Fund or from the Local Revenue Fund 2011 in the State Treasury, and formula distributions of dedicated funds as provided in the last fiscal year which ended prior to the effective
 date of this act.
